Mississippi, session 2026, HB580.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 9-7-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [Until January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 9-7-15.  (1)  The Fourth Circuit Court District shall be composed of the following counties: (a)  Leflore County; (b)  Sunflower County; and (c)  Washington County. (2)  The Fourth Circuit Court District shall be divided into four (4) subdistricts as follows: (a)  Subdistrict 4-1 shall consist of the following precincts in the following counties: (i)  Leflore County:  Central Greenwood* Minter City, Money, North Greenwood, Northeast Greenwood, Schlater, West Greenwood, Mississippi Valley State University and Southeast Greenwood Precincts; and (ii)  Sunflower County:  Ruleville, Rome, Sunflower Plantation, Drew, Doddsville, Boyer-Linn, Fairview-Hale and Ruleville North Precincts. (b)  Subdistrict 4-2 shall consist of the following precincts in the following counties: * * *(i)  Leflore County:  Central Greenwood*, East Greenwood, Morgan City/Swiftown, North Itta Bena, Rising Sun, Sidon, South Greenwood, South Itta Bena, Southwest Greenwood and West Greenwood*; ( * * *iii)  Sunflower County:  Sunflower, Indianola 3 North, Indianola 3 South*, Indianola Southeast and Indianola 3 Northeast Precincts; and ( * * *iiiii)  Washington County:  Darlove Baptist Church*, Extension Building, Lake Vista Masonic Lodge, Metcalfe City Hall, Elks Club*, Leland Rotary Club, Leland Health Department Clinic. (c)  Subdistrict 4-3 shall consist of the following precincts in the following counties: (i)  Leflore County:  Central Greenwood*, East Greenwood, Morgan City/Swiftown, North Itta Bena, Rising Sun, Sidon, South Greenwood, South Itta Bena, Southwest Greenwood and West Greenwood*; (iii)  Sunflower County:  Moorhead, Inverness, Indianola 3 South*, Indianola 2 West and Indianola 2 East Precincts; and ( * * *iiiii)  Washington County:  Arcola Technology Center*, Hollandale City Hall and Darlove Baptist Church*. (d)  Subdistrict 4-4 shall consist of the following precincts in Washington County:  Arcola Technology Center*, St. James Episcopal Church*, Swiftwater Baptist Church, Glen Allan Health Clinic, Elks Club*, Ward's Recreation Center, Buster Brown Community Center, Covenant Presbyterian, Jakes Chapel M.B. Church*, Brent Center, Tampa Drive and Washington County Convention Center Precincts. (3)  The local contributions required for the maintenance of the Fourth Circuit Court District shall be paid on a pro rata basis each by Leflore, Sunflower and Washington Counties. [From and after January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 9-7-15.  (1)  The Fourth Circuit Court District shall be composed of the following counties: (a)  Holmes County; (b)  Humphreys County; (c)  Leflore County; (d)  Sunflower County; and (e)  Washington County. (2)  The Fourth Circuit Court District shall be divided into * * * four (4) two (2) subdistricts as follows: (a)  Subdistrict 4-1 shall consist of Washington and Sunflower Counties. (b)  Subdistrict 4-2 shall consist of Leflore, Holmes and Humphreys Counties. SECTION 2.  Section 9-7-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 9-7-17.  There shall be four (4) circuit judges for the Fourth Circuit Court District.  One (1) circuit judge shall be elected from each subdistrict. [From and after January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 9-7-17.  There shall be four (4) circuit judges for the Fourth Circuit Court District.  Two (2) circuit judges shall be elected from each subdistrict.  The judgeships shall be separate and distinct and denominated only as "Subdistrict 4-1, Place One", "Subdistrict 4-1, Place Two", "Subdistrict 4-2, Place Three" and "Subdistrict 4-2, Place Four". SECTION 3.  Section 9-7-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-7-23. (1)  The Seventh Circuit Court District shall be Hinds County. (2)  The Seventh Circuit Court District shall be divided into four (4) subdistricts in Hinds County as follows: (a)  Subdistrict 7-1 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County:  32*, 44, 45, 46, 47*, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 92, 93, 96 and 97. (b)  Subdistrict 7-2 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County:  11*, 12*, 13*, 16*, 23, 27, 28, 29, 30, 38, 39*, 40, 41, 42*, 43*, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, Brownsville, Cynthia, Pocahontas and Tinnin. (c)  Subdistrict 7-3 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County:  18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 24, 25, 26, 31, 49*, 50, 51*, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58*, 59, 60, 61, 62, 63*, 64*, 67, 68, 69, 70*, 71, 86 and 89. (d)  Subdistrict 7-4 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County:  87, 88, 90, 91, 94, 95, Bolton, Byram 1, Byram 2, Byram 3, Cayuga, Chapel Hill, Clinton 1, Clinton 2, Clinton 3, Clinton 4, Clinton 5, Clinton 6, Clinton 7, Dry Grove, Edwards, Learned, Old Byram, Pinehaven, Raymond 1, Raymond 2, Spring Ridge, St. Thomas, Terry 1, Terry 2, Utica 1 and Utica 2. (e)  Subdistrict 7-5 shall consist of all precincts located within the boundaries of the Capitol Complex Improvement District as described by Section 29-5-203. [From January 1, 2027, until January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 9-7-23. (1)  The Seventh Circuit Court District shall be Claiborne, Hinds and Jefferson County. (2)  The Seventh Circuit Court District shall be divided into six (6) subdistricts as follows: (a)  Subdistrict 7-1 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County:  1, 10, 2, 32 * * **, 33, 34, 35, 36, 4, 44, 45, 46, 47 * * **, 6, 8, 9, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 92, 93, 96 and 97. (b)  Subdistrict 7-2 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County:  11 * * **, 12 * * **, 13 * * **, 16 * * **, 23, 27, 28, 29, 30, 37, 38, 39 * * **, 40, 41, 42 * * **, 43 * * **, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, Brownsville, Cynthia, Pocahontas and Tinnin. (c)  Subdistrict 7-3 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County:  18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 24, 25, 26, 31, 49 * * **, 50, 51 * * **, 52, * * * 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58 * * **, 59, 60, 61, 62, 63 * * **, 64 * * **, 67, 68, 69, 70 * * **, 71, 86 and 89. (d)  Subdistrict 7-4 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County:  87, 88, 90, 91, 94, 95, Bolton, Byram 1, Byram 2, Byram 3, Cayuga, Chapel Hill, Clinton 1, Clinton 2, Clinton 3, Clinton 4, Clinton 5, Clinton 6, Clinton 7, Dry Grove, Edwards, Learned, Old Byram, Pinehaven, Raymond 1, Raymond 2, Spring Ridge, St. Thomas, Terry 1, Terry 2, Utica 1 and Utica 2. (e)  Subdistrict 7-5 shall consist of Claiborne and Jefferson County. (f)  Subdistrict 7-6 shall consist of * * *all the following precincts located within the boundaries of the Capitol Complex Improvement District * * *as the lines are described in Section 29‑5‑203 on July 1, 2025:  1, 10, 11*, 12*, 13*, 14, 16*, 17, 2, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37, 39*, 4, 47*, 49*, 50, 51*, 58*, 6, 63*, 64*, 70*, 8 and 9. [From and after January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 9-7-23.  The Seventh Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Claiborne County; (b)  Hinds County; and (c)  Jefferson County. SECTION 4.  Section 9-7-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-7-25.  (1)  There shall be five (5) circuit judges for the Seventh Circuit Court District.  One (1) judge shall be elected from each subdistrict. (2)  While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the said judges other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the court in the First Judicial District of Hinds County, in the discretion of the senior circuit judge, may be divided into civil and criminal divisions as a matter of convenience, by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court. [From January 1, 2027, until January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 9-7-25.  There shall be six (6) circuit judges for the Seventh Circuit Court District.  The judgeships shall be separate and distinct.  One (1) judge shall be elected from each subdistrict. [From January 1, 2031, until January 1, 2035, this section shall read as follows:] 9-7-25.  (1)  There shall be six (6) circuit judges for the Seventh Circuit Court District.  The judgeships shall be separate and distinct. (2)  The Seventh Circuit Court District shall be divided into three (3) subdistricts as follows: (a)  Subdistrict 7-1 shall consist of Hinds County; (b)  Subdistrict 7-2 shall consist of Claiborne and Jefferson Counties; and (c)  Subdistrict 7-3 shall consist of all precincts located within the boundaries of the Capitol Complex Improvement District as described in Section 29-5-203. (3)  Four (4) judges shall be elected from subdistrict 7-1.  The judgeships for subdistrict 7-1 shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Subdistrict 7-1, Place One", "Subdistrict 7-1, Place Two", "Subdistrict 7-1, Place Three", and "Subdistrict 7-1, Place Four".  For subdistricts 7-2 and 7-3, one (1) judge shall be elected from each subdistrict. [From and after January 1, 2035, this section shall read as follows:] 9-7-25.  (1)  There shall be five (5) circuit judges for the Seventh Circuit Court District.  The judgeships shall be separate and distinct. (2)  The Seventh Circuit Court District shall be divided into two (2) subdistricts as follows: (a)  Subdistrict 7-1 shall consist of Hinds County; and (b)  Subdistrict 7-2 shall consist of Claiborne and Jefferson Counties. (3)  Four (4) judges shall be elected from subdistrict 7-1.  The judgeships for subdistrict 7-1 shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Subdistrict 7-1, Place One", "Subdistrict 7-1, Place Two", "Subdistrict 7-1, Place Three", and "Subdistrict 7-1, Place Four".  One (1) judge shall be elected from subdistrict 7-2. SECTION 5.  (1)  If this act is approved by the Governor or becomes law without the Governor's signature by January 23, 2026, any candidate for the office of circuit judge for the Fourth Circuit Court District whose term of office begins January 1, 2027, for the Fourth District shall file their intent to be a candidate no later than February 2, 2026, and qualify as otherwise provided in Section 23-15-977 for candidates for judicial office; however, if this act has not been approved by the Governor or does not become law without the Governor's signature by January 23, 2026, any candidate for the offices of circuit judge for the Fourth Circuit Court District whose term of office begins January 1, 2027, for the Fourth Circuit Court District shall file their intent to be a candidate no later than 5:00 p.m. on May 1, 2026, and qualify as otherwise provided in Section 23-15-977 for candidates for judicial office. (2) If this act is approved by the Governor or becomes law without the Governor's signature by January 23, 2026, any candidate for the office of circuit judge for the Seventh Circuit Court District that takes office from and after January 1, 2027, for the Seventh Circuit Court District shall file their intent to be a candidate no later than February 2, 2026, and qualify as otherwise provided in Section 23-15-977 for candidates for judicial office; however, if this act has not been approved by the Governor or does not become law without the Governor's signature by January 23, 2026, any candidate for the office of circuit judge for the Seventh Circuit Court District that takes office from and after January 1, 2027, for the Seventh Circuit Court District shall file their intent to be a candidate no later than 5:00 p.m. on May 1, 2026, and qualify as otherwise provided in Section 23-15-977 for candidates for judicial office. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.